Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 5
COLORADO CONTRABAND FORFEITURE ACT

16-13-501. Short title.

This part 5 shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Contraband Forfeiture Act".

Source:

L. 84:

Entire part added, p. 505, § 1, effective July 1.

16-13-501.5. Legislative declaration.

It is the intent of the general assembly that proceedings under this part 5 be remedial in nature and designed to benefit the public good by appropriating contraband property for use by law enforcement.

It is also the policy of the general assembly that asset forfeiture pursuant to this part 5 shall be carried out pursuant to the following:

Generation of revenue shall not be the primary purpose of asset forfeiture.

No prosecutor's or law enforcement officer's employment or level of salary shall depend upon the frequency of seizures or forfeitures which such person achieves.

Each seizing agency shall have policies and procedures for the expeditious release of seized property which is not subject to forfeiture pursuant to this part 5, when such release is appropriate.

Each seizing agency retaining forfeited property for official law enforcement use shall ensure that the property is subject to controls consistent with controls which are applicable to property acquired through the normal appropriations process.

Each seizing agency which receives forfeiture proceeds shall conform with reporting, audit, and disposition procedures enumerated in this article.

Each seizing agency shall prohibit its employees from purchasing forfeited property.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 639, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 626, § 1, effective July 1.

16-13-502. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Contraband article" means any controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., any other drug the possession of which is an offense under the laws of this state, any imitation controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-420 (3), C.R.S., or any drug paraphernalia, as defined in section 18-18-426, C.R.S.

(1.5) "Conviction" means a verdict of guilty by a judge or jury or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere that is accepted by the court or adjudication for an offense that would constitute a criminal offense if committed by an adult.

(1.7) "Instrumental" means a substantial connection exists between the property and the unlawful use of the property.

(1.8) "Proceeds traceable" or "traceable proceeds" means all property, real and personal, corporeal and incorporeal, which is proceeds attributable to, derived from, or realized through, directly or indirectly, a subject act described in section 16-13-503, whether proved by direct, circumstantial, or documentary evidence. There shall be no requirement of showing of a trail of documentary evidence to trace proceeds if the standard of proof by clear and convincing evidence is met.

"Seizing agency" means any agency that is charged with the enforcement of the laws of this state, of any other state, or of the United States relating to controlled substances and that has participated in a seizure or has been substantially involved in effecting a forfeiture through legal representation pursuant to this part 5; except that the filing of any lien against property forfeited under this part 5 by the governing body or agency thereof of any seizing agency after the date of seizure shall preclude such agency from participating pursuant to this part 5 as a seizing agency and shall deny any such agency from receiving any proceeds under this part 5. The department of corrections and a multijurisdictional task force shall be deemed to be included under this definition.

"Vehicle" means any device of conveyance capable of moving itself or of being moved from place to place upon wheels, tracks, or water or through the air, whether or not intended for the transport of persons or property, and includes any place therein adapted for overnight accommodation of persons or animals or for the carrying on of business.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire part added, p. 505, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 639, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 391, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 872, § 5, effective May 24.

L. 2002:

(1.5) and (1.7) added and (2) amended, p. 924, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1.8) added, p. 904, § 15, effective July 1.

16-13-503. Subject acts.

The following acts are subject to this part 5:

Engaging in the unlawful manufacture, cultivation, growth, production, processing, or distribution for sale of, or sale of, or storing or possessing for any unlawful manufacture or distribution for sale of, or for sale of, any controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., any other drug the possession of which is an offense under the laws of this state, or any imitation controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-420 (3), C.R.S.;

Engaging in the unlawful manufacture, sale, or distribution of drug paraphernalia, as defined in section 18-18-426, C.R.S.;

Transporting, carrying, or conveying any contraband article in, upon, or by means of any vehicle for the purpose of sale, storage, or possession of such contraband article;

Concealing or possessing any contraband article in or upon any vehicle for the purpose of sale of such contraband article;

Using any vehicle to facilitate the transportation, carriage, conveyance, concealment, receipt, possession, or purchase for sale of any contraband article, or the sale, barter, exchange, or giving away of any contraband article; and

Concealing or possessing any contraband article for the purpose of sale.

Mere possession of less than sixteen ounces of marijuana shall not be an act subject to the provisions of this part 5.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire part added, p. 506, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1360, § 10, effective June 28.

L. 87:

(2) added, p. 639, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 392, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1352), ch. 259, p. 1173, § 15, effective August 11.

16-13-504. Forfeiture of vehicle, fixtures and contents of building, personal property, or contraband article - exceptions.

Any vehicle or personal property, including fixtures and contents of a structure or building, as defined in section 16-13-301 (2), currency, securities, or negotiable instruments, which has been or is being used in any of the acts specified in section 16-13-503 or in, upon, or by means of which any act under said section has taken or is taking place; or any currency, negotiable instruments, securities, or other things of value furnished or intended to be furnished by any person in exchange for any of the acts listed in section 16-13-503; or any proceeds traceable to the acts listed in section 16-13-503; or any currency, negotiable instruments, or securities used or intended to be used to facilitate any of the acts listed in section 16-13-503 are contraband property and shall be seized, as well as any contraband article. Any peace officer or agent of a seizing agency may seize and hold such property or articles if there is probable cause to believe that such property or articles are contraband and the seizure is incident to a lawful search. All rights and interest in and title to contraband property shall immediately vest in the state upon seizure by a seizing agency, subject only to perfection of title, rights, and interests in accordance with this part 5. Neither replevin nor any other action to recover any interest in such property shall be maintained in any court except as provided in this part 5.

(1.5) If a rental motor vehicle is seized pursuant to this part 5, the seizing agency shall notify the motor vehicle rental company of the seizure if the motor vehicle is identified as a rental motor vehicle. The motor vehicle rental company may appear at the seizing agency and request the return of the rental motor vehicle. The rental motor vehicle shall be returned to the motor vehicle rental company unless the motor vehicle must be maintained in the custody of the seizing agency for evidentiary purposes or if the seizing agency has probable cause to believe the motor vehicle rental company, at the time of rental, had knowledge or notice of the criminal activity for which the rental car was used.

In any action seeking forfeiture of property pursuant to this part 5, any person, including a lienholder, who seeks to contest the forfeiture shall establish by a preponderance of the evidence such person's standing as a true owner of the property or a true owner with an interest in the property.

To establish standing, the person shall first prove that the person has a recorded or registered interest in the property, or a bona fide marital interest in the property, if the property is of a type for which interests can be, and customarily are, recorded or registered in a public office.

The person shall also prove that the person is a true owner of the property or a true owner of an interest in the property. The factors to be considered by the court in determining whether a person is a true owner shall include, but need not be limited to:

Whether the person had the primary use, benefit, possession, or control of the property;

How much of the consideration for the purchase or ownership of the property was furnished by the person, and whether the person furnished reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the property or interest;

Whether the transaction by which the person acquired the property or interest was secret, concealed, undisclosed, hurried, or not in the usual mode of doing business;

Whether the transaction by which the person acquired the property or interest was conducted through the use of a shell, alter ego, nominee, or fictitious party;

Whether the person is a relative, a co-conspirator, complicitor, or an accessory in the public nuisance act or acts or other criminal activity, a business associate in a legal or illegal business, one who maintains a special or close relationship with, or an insider with respect to the perpetrator of the alleged public nuisance act or acts;

Whether the person is silent or fails to call parties to testify or to produce available evidence explaining the acquisition of the property or factors which may be badges of fraud or deceit, or show lack of true ownership;

Whether the timing of the transaction by which the person acquired the property was during the pendency or threat of litigation, or during any time when the person knew, should have known, or had notice of the public nuisance act or acts or the threat of a forfeiture action;

Whether the placing of the title in the name of, or the putative ownership in, or transfer to, the person was done with intent to delay, hinder, or avoid a forfeiture, or for some purpose other than ownership of the property;

Whether the perpetrator of the alleged public nuisance act or acts has absconded or is a fugitive from justice and the conveyance occurred after the flight, or before the flight, in any of the circumstances set forth in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (c);

Whether the subject matter property is of a kind in which property or ownership rights can legally exist;

Any other badge or indicia of fraud under article 8 of title 38, C.R.S., or the general law of fraudulent transfers or conveyances.

The court shall consider the totality of the circumstances in determining whether a person is a true owner. A person contesting the forfeiture does not necessarily have to show that all of the factors enumerated in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2) support the claim of true ownership, nor does the person necessarily establish true ownership by showing the absence of fraudulent intent or badges of fraud.

No private sale or conveyance of a used motor vehicle shall be deemed to make a party eligible to assert standing to contest the forfeiture thereof, unless the title to the motor vehicle, with transfer duly executed to the party, has been filed with the division of motor vehicles in the department of revenue prior to the physical seizure of the vehicle and the recording of a notice of seizure, or the party attempting to assert standing has exclusive possession of the vehicle at the time of seizure. A party eligible to assert standing under this paragraph (e) must nevertheless establish that the party is a true owner of the vehicle or has an interest therein pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (2).

Unless the standing of a particular party is conceded in the complaint initiating the public nuisance action, a party must assert standing in the answer and fully describe the party's interest in the property which is the subject matter of the action, and submit a verified statement, supported by any available documentation, of the party's ownership of or interest in the property.

(2.1) (a) In any action to forfeit property pursuant to this part 5, the plaintiff, in addition to any other matter which must be proven in the plaintiff's case in chief, shall prove by clear and convincing evidence that possession of the property is unlawful, or that the owner of the property or interest therein was involved in or knew of the subject act. The plaintiff shall also prove by clear and convincing evidence that the property was instrumental in the commission or facilitation of the crime or the property constitutes traceable proceeds of the crime or related criminal activity.

The claimant in an action brought pursuant to this part 5 may petition the court to determine whether a forfeiture was constitutionally excessive. Upon the conclusion of a trial resulting in a judgment of forfeiture in an action brought pursuant to this part 5, if the evidence presented raises an issue of proportionality under this paragraph (a.5), the defendant may petition the court to set a hearing, or the court may on its own motion set a hearing to determine whether a forfeiture was constitutionally excessive. This determination shall be made prior to any sale or distribution of forfeited property.

In making this determination, the court shall compare the forfeiture to the gravity of the public nuisance act giving rise to the forfeiture and related criminal activity.

The defendant shall have the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that the forfeiture is grossly disproportional.

If the court finds that the forfeiture is grossly disproportional to the public nuisance act and related criminal activity, it shall reduce or eliminate the forfeiture as necessary to avoid a violation of the excessive fines clause of the eighth amendment of the United States constitution or article II, section 20, of the Colorado constitution.

and (VI) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 890, § 2, effective July 1, 2003.)

As used in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.1), an owner was "involved in or knew of the subject act" if it is established that:

The owner was involved in the subject act; or

The owner knew of the subject act or had notice of the acts facilitating the criminal activity or prior similar conduct and failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit or abate the illegal use of the property;

Notwithstanding the provisions of sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II), if the plaintiff proves by clear and convincing evidence that the owner knew or had notice of the unlawful use of the property, the owner must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the owner took reasonable steps to prohibit or abate the unlawful use of the property for the court to find the owner was not a party to the offense or related criminal activity.

(2.2) (a) With respect to a partial or whole ownership interest in existence at the time the conduct subjecting the property to seizure took place, the term "innocent owner" means any owner who:

Did not have actual knowledge of the conduct subjecting the property to seizure or notice of an act or circumstance facilitating the criminal activity or prior similar conduct, notice being satisfied by, but not limited to, sending notice of an act or circumstance facilitating the criminal activity by certified mail; or

Upon learning of the conduct subjecting the property to seizure, took reasonable steps to prohibit the conduct. An owner may demonstrate that he or she took reasonable action to prohibit such conduct if the owner:

Timely revoked or attempted to revoke permission for those engaging in such conduct to use the property; or

Took reasonable actions to discourage or prevent the use of the property in conduct subjecting the property to seizure.

With respect to a partial or whole ownership interest acquired after the conduct subjecting the property to seizure has occurred, the term "innocent owner" means a person who, at the time he or she acquired the interest in the property, had no knowledge that the illegal conduct subjecting the property to seizure had occurred or that the property had been seized for forfeiture, and:

Acquired an interest in the property in a bona fide transaction for value;

Acquired an interest in the property through probate or inheritance; or

Acquired an interest in the property through dissolution of marriage or by operation of law.

An innocent owner's interest in property shall not be forfeited under any provision of state law. An innocent owner has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that he or she has an ownership interest in the subject property. Otherwise, the burden of proof under this subsection (2.2) shall be as provided in subsection (2.1) of this section.

A person who is convicted of a criminal offense arising from the same activity giving rise to the forfeiture proceedings in accordance with section

16-13-505

(1.5) shall not be eligible to assert an innocent owner defense.

(2.3) The prosecuting attorney shall set forth in the petition initiating the forfeiture action pursuant to this part 5 the existence of any liens and whether forfeiture of any liens will be sought. If forfeiture of a lien is not sought, the lienholder does not need to appear to preserve any interest in the property which is the subject of the forfeiture action which such lienholder may possess.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 627, § 2, effective July 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 84:

Entire part added, p. 506, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) and (3) amended and (2) R&RE, pp. 639, 640, §§ 17, 18, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) and (3) amended and (2.1), (2.2), and (2.3) added, p. 627, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1.5) added and (2.1) and (2.2) amended, p. 924, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2), (2.1)(a), (2.1)(a.5), (2.1)(b)(I), (2.1)(b)(II), (2.2)(a)(I), and (2.2)(c) amended and (2.2)(d) added, pp. 900, 890, 903, §§ 11, 2, 13, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2.1)(b) amended, p. 1197, § 48, effective August 4.

16-13-504.5. Limitations on receipt of forfeiture payments from federal agencies.

A seizing agency or participant in any joint task force or other multijurisdictional collaboration shall accept payment or distribution from a federal agency of all or a portion of any forfeiture proceeds resulting from adoption or a joint task force or other multijurisdictional collaboration only if the aggregate net equity value of the property and currency seized in a case is in excess of fifty thousand dollars and a forfeiture proceeding is commenced by the federal government and relates to a filed criminal case.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not be construed to restrict seizing agencies from collaborating with a federal agency to seize property that the seizing agency has probable cause to believe is the proceeds or instruments of a crime through an intergovernmental joint task force.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1313), ch. 403, p. 2106, § 3, effective August 9.

16-13-505. Forfeiture proceedings.

The several district courts of this state shall have original jurisdiction in proceedings under this part 5.

(1.5) No judgment of forfeiture of property in any forfeiture proceeding shall be entered unless and until an owner of the property is convicted of an offense involving the conduct listed in section 16-13-503, or a lesser included offense of an eligible offense if the conviction is the result of a negotiated guilty plea. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the conviction to be obtained in the same jurisdiction as the jurisdiction in which the forfeiture action is brought. In the event criminal charges arising from the same activity giving rise to the forfeiture proceedings are filed against any individual claiming an interest in the property subject to the forfeiture proceeding, the trial and discovery phases of the forfeiture proceeding shall be stayed by the court until the disposition of the criminal charges. A stay shall not be maintained during an appeal or post-conviction proceeding challenging a criminal conviction. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or prevent the parties from contemporaneously resolving criminal charges and a forfeiture proceeding arising from the same activity.

(1.6) Upon acquittal or dismissal of a criminal action against a person named in a forfeiture action related to the criminal action, unless the forfeiture action was brought pursuant to one or more of paragraphs (a) to (f) of subsection (1.7) of this section, the forfeiture claim shall be dismissed and the seized property shall be returned as respects the subject matter property or interest therein of that person, if the case has been adjudicated as to all other claims, interests, and owners, unless possession of the property is illegal. If the forfeiture action is dismissed or judgment is entered in favor of the claimant, the claimant shall not be subject to any monetary charges by the state for storage of the property or expenses incurred in the preservation of the property, unless at the time of dismissal the plaintiff shows that those expenses would have been incurred to prevent waste of the property even if it had not been seized.

(1.7) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1.5) of this section:

A person shall lack standing for and shall be disallowed from pursuit of a claim or defense in a civil forfeiture action upon a finding that a warrant or other process has been issued for the apprehension of the person, and, in order to avoid criminal prosecution, the person:

Purposely leaves the state; or

Declines to enter or reenter the state to submit to its jurisdiction; or

Otherwise evades the jurisdiction of the court in which a criminal case is pending against the person or from which a warrant has been issued, by failing to appear in court or surrender on the warrant; and

Is not known to be confined or held in custody in any other jurisdiction within the United States for commission of criminal conduct in that jurisdiction.

If a person lacks standing pursuant to this paragraph (a), the forfeiture action may proceed and a judgment of forfeiture may be entered without a criminal conviction of an owner, upon motion and notice as provided in the rules of civil procedure.

If, following notice to all persons known to have an interest or who have asserted an interest in the property subject to forfeiture, an owner fails to file an answer or other appropriate response with the court claiming an interest in the subject matter property, or no person establishes standing to contest the forfeiture action pursuant to section 16-13-504 (2), a forfeiture action may proceed and a judgment of forfeiture may be entered without a criminal conviction of an owner.

If the plaintiff proves by clear and convincing evidence that the property was instrumental in the commission of an offense listed in section 16-13-503 (1) or that the property is traceable proceeds of the offense or related criminal activity by a nonowner and the plaintiff proves by clear and convincing evidence that an owner is not an innocent owner pursuant to section 16-13-504 (2.2), a judgment of forfeiture may be entered without a criminal conviction of an owner.

If an owner of the property who was involved in the public nuisance act or conduct giving rise to the claim of forfeiture subsequently dies, and was not an innocent owner pursuant to section 16-13-504 (2.2), a judgment of forfeiture may be entered without a criminal conviction of an owner.

If an owner received a deferred judgment, deferred sentence, or participated in a diversion program, or in the case of a juvenile a deferred adjudication or deferred sentence or participated in a diversion program for the offense, a judgment of forfeiture may be entered without a criminal conviction.

A defendant or claimant shall be permitted to waive the requirement of a criminal conviction in order to settle a forfeiture action.

The prosecuting attorney shall file a petition in forfeiture to perfect title in seized contraband property no later than sixty-three days after the seizure. The prosecuting attorney may file the petition after the expiration of sixty-three days from the date of seizure only if the petition is accompanied by a written statement of good cause for the late filing. The sixty-three-day time limitation established by this paragraph (a) shall not apply where the seizure of the property occurred pursuant to a warrant authorizing such seizure or otherwise under any statute or rule of criminal procedure if the property is held as evidence in a pending criminal investigation or in a pending criminal case. The petition shall be accompanied by a supporting affidavit, and both shall describe the property seized with reasonable particularity and shall include a list of witnesses to be called in support of the claim for forfeiture, including the addresses and telephone numbers thereof.

If the court finds from the petition and supporting affidavit that probable cause exists to believe that the seized property is contraband property as defined in this part 5, it shall, without delay, issue a citation directed to interested parties to show cause why the property should not be forfeited. The citation shall fix the date and time for a first appearance on the petition. The date fixed shall be no less than thirty-five days and no more than sixty-three days from the date of the issuance of the citation.

At the first appearance on the petition, the court shall set a date and time for a hearing on the merits of the petition within forty-nine days after the first appearance.

The only responsive pleading shall be designated a response to petition and citation to show cause and shall be filed with the court at or before the first appearance on the petition and shall include:

A statement admitting or denying the averments of the petition;

A statement setting forth with particularity why the seized property should not be forfeited. The statement shall include specific factual and legal grounds supporting it and any affirmative defense to forfeiture as provided in this part 5.

A list of witnesses whom the respondent intends to call at the hearing on the merits, including the addresses and telephone numbers thereof; and

A verified statement, supported by documentation, that the claimant is the true owner of the property or an interest therein.

No claim for relief against the plaintiff shall be set forth in the response, except a request for return of the seized property.

(2.5) All forfeiture actions shall proceed in state district court if the property was seized by a local or state law enforcement agency as a result of an ongoing state criminal investigation and the owner is being prosecuted in state court. Unless, directed by an authorized agent of the federal government, no state or local law enforcement agency may transfer any property seized by the state or local agency to a federal agency for forfeiture under federal law unless an owner of the property is being prosecuted in federal court.

The citation specified in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section shall:

Describe the property;

State the county, place, and date of seizure;

State the name of the agency holding the seized property;

State the date and time of the first appearance and the court in which it will be held;

State that judgment in favor of the plaintiff shall enter forthwith against any party who fails to file a response pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of this section or who fails to appear personally or by counsel at the first appearance before the court; and

Advise the defendant of the right to continue the action under the circumstances stated in subsection (5) of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 5, the practice and procedure in an action to perfect title to contraband property shall be governed by the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Actions to perfect title to contraband property shall be included in the category of "expedited proceedings" specified in rules 16 and 26 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure; except that each party may conduct limited discovery as provided for in rule 26 (b)(2) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure. In addition, each party may move the court to authorize additional discovery upon good cause shown.

Continuance of the hearing on the merits shall be granted upon stipulation of the parties or upon good cause shown.

The hearing on the merits shall be heard by the court without a jury.

If the seized property is of a type for which title or registration is required by law, or if the owner of the property and his or her address are known in fact, or if the seized property is subject to a perfected security interest, the prosecuting attorney shall give notice of the forfeiture action to the claimant, either by personal service of the petition, supporting affidavit, and citation upon him or her or by sending copies of such documents by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last-known address of such claimant. If the documents are properly mailed to an address which the prosecutor has reasonable grounds to believe is the last-known address of the potential claimant, said documents shall be deemed served whether or not the claimant responds to the notice to claim them at the post office. Unknown persons who may claim any interest in the property, persons whose addresses are unknown, and persons upon whom the prosecutor has been unable to effect service as otherwise provided in this subsection (7) despite diligent good faith efforts may be served pursuant to a court order by publishing a copy of the citation twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proceeding is instituted. The fact of such publication shall be conclusively established by the publisher's affidavit of publication. The first publication shall be more than fourteen days and the last publication not less than seven days before the first appearance date on the citation.

If any claimant to the property subject to a forfeiture action, including a claimant unknown to the plaintiff, is properly served with the citation according to the procedures specified in subsection (7) of this section and fails to appear personally or by counsel on the first appearance date or fails to file a response as required by this section, the court shall forthwith find said person in default and enter an order forfeiting said person's interest in the property and distributing the proceeds of forfeiture as provided in this part 5. A default order of forfeiture entered pursuant to this section shall only be set aside upon an express finding by the court that a claimant was improperly served through no fault of such claimant and had no notice of the first appearance on the citation or was prevented from appearing and responding due to an emergency situation caused by events beyond such claimant's control when such claimant had made diligent, good faith, and reasonable efforts to prepare a response and appear.

If a forfeiture hearing held pursuant to this part 5 results in an order to return the subject property to a claimant and the prosecution states an intent to appeal and proceeds to initiate an appeal of the order, the court shall stay execution of the order pending appeal, unless the court finds that the appeal is taken in bad faith or for the purpose of delay. No appeal bond shall be required, but the court may make appropriate orders to preserve the value of the property pending appeal.

The evidentiary burdens at a forfeiture hearing brought pursuant to this part 5 shall be as follows:

The claimant shall first prove by a preponderance of the evidence that such claimant is the true owner of the property.

If the claimant establishes that such claimant is the true owner of the property sought to be forfeited, the prosecuting attorney shall have the burden of going forward with the evidence and proving the allegations of the petition by clear and convincing evidence.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 629, § 3, effective July 1, 1993.)

Actions pursuant to this part 5 shall be brought in the name of the people of the state of Colorado by the district attorney in the county in which the property was seized or in the county in which any subject act occurred. With the consent of the district attorney, the attorney general may also bring such an action.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire part added, p. 507, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(2) amended, p. 735, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section R&RE, p. 640, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2), (3), (5), (7), (8), and (10) amended, p. 629, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1.5), (1.6), (1.7), and (2.5) added and (10)(b) amended, p. 927, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1.5), (1.6), (1.7), (4), and (5) amended, pp. 894, 907, 897, §§ 5, 20, 9, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(2)(a), (2)(b), (2)(c), and (7) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 858, § 93, effective July 1.

16-13-506. Final order - disposition of property.

If the prosecution prevails in the forfeiture action, the court shall order the property forfeited and perfect the state's right and interest in and title to such property. The court shall also order such property to be sold at public sale by the law enforcement agency in possession of the property in the manner provided for sales on execution or in another commercially reasonable manner. The proceeds of sale shall be applied in the manner and priority enumerated in section 16-13-311. The order for sale shall perfect the state's right and interest in and title to the property and shall relate back to the date when title to the property vested in the state pursuant to section 16-13-316.

In the event that the seizing agency is a state agency, proceeds allocated to such agency pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed directly to said state agency.

It is the intent of the general assembly that moneys allocated to a seizing agency pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall not be considered a source of revenue to meet normal operating needs.

If more than one seizing agency was substantially involved in effecting the forfeiture, the agencies shall enter into a stipulation with regard to costs incurred by the agencies and the percentage of any remaining proceeds which shall be deposited for the benefit of the agencies, and, upon filing such stipulation with the court, the court shall order the proceeds so distributed. If the agencies are unable to reach an agreement, the court shall take testimony and equitably distribute the proceeds according to the formula set out in subsection (1) of this section.

(4.5) If the court finds that a vehicle or personal property forfeited pursuant to this part 5 can be used for law enforcement purposes by a seizing agency, the court shall order that the vehicle or personal property be delivered to the agency instead of sold. If more than one seizing agency was substantially involved in effecting the forfeiture, the priority for receiving such vehicle or personal property shall be established by stipulation pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

Any forfeited money or currency shall be in addition to the proceeds obtained from sale of forfeited personalty and shall be equitably distributed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Upon the sale of any vehicle, the state shall issue a certificate of title to the purchaser thereof.

In any order issued by the court pursuant to subsections (1) and (4) of this section, the court shall only order the amounts to be distributed and to whom, and the courts shall not have the power to dictate the use for which the moneys are to be appropriated, employed, received, or expended by the seizing agency or injured person.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 450, § 5, effective July 1, 1992.)

Repealed.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire part added, p. 507, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

IP(1) amended, (1)(c)(I) R&RE, and (1)(c)(I.5) and (4.5) added, p. 643, §§ 20, 21, 22, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(8) amended, p. 450, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(c) amended, p. 872, § 6, effective May 24.

L. 98:

(8)(b) repealed, p. 726, § 5, effective May 18.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 928, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 906, § 18, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For provisions on reporting and disposition of forfeited property, see part 7 of this article 13.

16-13-507. Disposition of contraband article or property.

Any property seized pursuant to section 16-13-504 which is required by law to be destroyed, or the possession of which is illegal, or which in the opinion of the court is not properly the subject of a sale may be destroyed pursuant to a warrant for the destruction of personal property issued by the court and directed to the sheriff of the proper county or any peace officer and returned by the sheriff or peace officer after execution thereof. The court shall stay the execution of any such warrant during the period in which the property is used as evidence in any pending criminal or civil proceeding.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire part added, p. 509, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 643, § 23, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For provisions on reporting and disposition of forfeited property, see part 7 of this article 13.

16-13-508. Forfeitures.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this part 5, this part 5 shall not be construed as an amendment or repeal of any of the criminal laws of this state, but the provisions of this part 5, insofar as they relate to those laws, shall be considered a cumulative right of the people in the enforcement of such laws. Nothing in this part 5 shall be construed to limit or preempt the powers of any court or political subdivision to abate or control public nuisances, and this part 5 shall be an additional remedy in those situations where an action could be brought under part 3 of this article.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire part added, p. 509, § 1, effective July 1.